California statutes. Penal Code
(12) Assault with a stun gun or taser, in violation of Section 244.5.

(13) Assault with a deadly weapon, firearm, assault weapon, or machinegun, or by means likely to produce great bodily injury, in violation of Section 245.

(14) Rape, in violation of Section 261 or former Section 262.

(15) Procuring a person to have sex with another
 person, in violation of Section 266, 266a, 266b, or 266c.

(16) Child abuse or endangerment, in violation of Section 273a or 273d.

(17) Abuse of spouse or cohabitant, in violation of Section 273.5.

(18) Sodomy, in violation of Section 286.

(19) Lewd and lascivious acts with a child, in violation of Section 288.

(20) Oral copulation, in violation of Section 287 or former Section 288a.

(21) Sexual penetration, in violation of Section 289.

(22) Elder abuse, in violation of Section 368.

(23) An attempt
 to commit any crime specified in paragraphs (1) to (22), inclusive.

(e) When two or more persons who are required to report are present and jointly have knowledge of a known or suspected instance of violence that is required to be reported pursuant to this section, and when there is an agreement among these persons to report as a team, the team may select by mutual agreement a member of the team to make a report by telephone and a single written report, as required by subdivision (b). The written report shall be signed by the selected member of the reporting team. Any member who has knowledge that the member designated to report has failed to do so shall thereafter make the report.

(f) The reporting duties under this section are individual, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(g) A supervisor or administrator
 shall not impede or inhibit the reporting duties required under this section and a person making a report pursuant to this section shall not be subject to any sanction for making the report. However, internal procedures to facilitate reporting and apprise supervisors and administrators of reports may be established, except that these procedures shall not be inconsistent with this article. The internal procedures shall not require an employee required to make a report under this article to disclose the employee’s identity to the employer.

(h) For the purposes of this section, it is the Legislature’s intent to avoid duplication of information.

(i) For purposes of this section only, “employed by a local government agency” includes an employee of an entity under contract with a local government agency to provide medical services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 63.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11160.1.

(a) Any health practitioner employed in any health facility, clinic, physician’s office, local or state public health department, or a clinic or other type of facility operated by a local or state public health department who, in his or her professional capacity or within the scope of his or her employment, performs a forensic medical examination on any person in the custody of law enforcement from
 whom evidence is sought in connection with the commission or investigation of a crime of sexual assault, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 11160, shall prepare a written report. The report shall be on a standard form developed by, or at the direction of, the Office of Emergency Services, and shall be immediately provided to the law enforcement agency who has custody of the individual examined.

(b) The examination and report is subject to the confidentiality requirements of the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 56) of Part 2.6 of Division 1 of the Civil Code), the physician-patient privilege pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 990) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, and the privilege of official information pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 1040) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code.

(c) The report shall be released upon request, oral or written, to any person or agency involved in any related investigation or prosecution of a criminal case, including, but not limited to, a law enforcement officer, district attorney, city attorney, crime laboratory, county licensing agency, or coroner. The report may be released to defense counsel or another third party only through discovery of documents in the possession of a prosecuting agency or following the issuance of a lawful court order authorizing the release of the report.

(d) A health practitioner who makes a report in accordance with this section shall not incur civil or criminal liability. No person, agency, or their designee required or authorized to report pursuant to this section who takes photographs of a person suspected of being a person subject to a forensic medical examination as described in this section shall incur any civil or criminal liability for
 taking the photographs, causing the photographs to be taken, or disseminating the photographs to a law enforcement officer, district attorney, city attorney, crime laboratory, county licensing agency, or coroner with the reports required in accordance with this section. However, this subdivision shall not be deemed to grant immunity from civil or criminal liability with respect to any other use of the photographs.

(e) Section 11162 does not apply to this section.

(f) With the exception of any health practitioner who has entered into a contractual agreement to perform forensic medical examinations, no health practitioner shall be required to perform a forensic medical examination as part of his or her duties as a health practitioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 419.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

11161.

Notwithstanding Section 11160, the following shall apply to every physician or surgeon who has under his or her charge or care any person described in subdivision (a) of Section 11160:

(a) The physician or surgeon shall make a report in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 11160 to a local law enforcement agency.

(b) It is recommended that any medical records of a person about whom the physician or surgeon is required to report
 pursuant to subdivision (a) include the following:

(1) Any comments by the injured person regarding past domestic violence, as defined in Section 13700, or regarding the name of any person suspected of inflicting the wound, other physical injury, or assaultive or abusive conduct upon the person.

(2) A map of the injured person’s body showing and identifying injuries and bruises at the time of the health care.

(3) A copy of the law enforcement reporting form.

(c) It is recommended that the physician or surgeon refer the person to local domestic violence services if the person is suffering or suspected of suffering from domestic violence, as defined in Section 13700.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 992, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11161.2.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that adequate protection of victims of domestic violence and elder and dependent adult abuse has been hampered by lack of consistent and comprehensive medical examinations. Medical evidentiary examinations, offered to victims free of charge, and enhanced examination procedures, documentation, and evidence collection will improve patient outcomes, investigation, and prosecution efforts.

(b) The Office of Emergency Services shall, in cooperation with the State Department of Public Health, the Department of Aging and the ombudsman program, the State Department of Social Services, law enforcement agencies, the Department of Justice, the
 California Association of Crime Lab Directors, the California District Attorneys Association, the California State Sheriffs’ Association, the California Medical Association, the California Police Chiefs’ Association, domestic violence advocates, the California Clinical Forensic Medical Training Center, the California Sexual Assault Forensic Examiner Association, Adult Protective Services, and other appropriate experts:

(1) Establish medical forensic forms, instructions, and examination protocol for victims of domestic violence and elder and dependent adult abuse and neglect, including strangulation, using as a model the form and guidelines developed pursuant to Section 13823.5. The form should include, but not be limited to, a place for a notation concerning each of the following:

(A) Notification of injuries and a report of suspected domestic violence or elder or dependent adult abuse and neglect to law enforcement authorities, Adult Protective Services, or the State Long-Term Care Ombudsmen, in accordance with existing reporting procedures.

(B) Obtaining consent for the forensic medical examination, treatment of injuries, collection of evidence, and written and photographic documentation of injuries. A victim shall be informed that they may refuse to consent to and may withdraw consent for an examination for evidence of domestic violence and elder and dependent adult abuse and neglect, including the collection of physical evidence, but that refusal is not a ground for denial of treatment of injuries and disease, if the person wishes to obtain treatment and consents thereto.

(C) Taking a patient’s history of domestic violence or elder or dependent adult abuse and neglect, including any current or past strangulation history, and other relevant medical history.

(D) Performance of the physical examination for evidence of domestic violence or elder or dependent adult abuse and neglect.

(E) Collection of physical evidence of domestic violence or elder or dependent adult abuse.

(F) Collection of other medical and forensic specimens, as indicated.

(G) Procedures for the collection and preservation of evidence, and submission to a local crime laboratory when appropriate.

(H) Complete documentation of medical forensic exam findings.

(I) When strangulation is suspected, documentation may be included on a supplemental strangulation form as part of the medical evidentiary exam.

(2) The forms shall be made accessible for use in an electronic format.

(3) The forms shall become part of the patient’s medical record.

(c) When strangulation is suspected, additional diagnostic testing may be necessary to prevent adverse health outcomes or morbidity.

(d) Victims receiving forensic medical exams for domestic violence have the
 right to a qualified social worker, victim advocate, or a support person of the victim’s choosing to be present during the examination, when available.

(e) (1) A hospital, clinic, or other emergency medical facility where medical evidentiary examinations are conducted shall develop and implement written policies and procedures for maintaining the confidentiality of medical evidentiary examination reports, including proper preservation and disposition of the reports if the examination program ceases operation, in order to prevent destruction of the medical evidentiary examination reports.

(2) On or before July 1, 2023, a hospital, clinic, or other emergency medical facility at which medical evidentiary examinations are conducted shall implement a system to maintain medical
 evidentiary examination reports in a manner that facilitates release of the reports as required or authorized by law.

(3) This subdivision does not require a hospital, clinic, or other emergency medical facility to review a patient’s medical records before January 1, 2023, in order to separate medical evidentiary examination reports from the rest of the patient’s medical records.

(f) The costs associated with the medical evidentiary examination of a domestic violence victim shall be separate from diagnostic treatment and procedure costs associated with medical treatment. Costs for the medical evidentiary portion of the examination shall not be charged directly or indirectly to the victim of the assault.

(g) Each
 county’s board of supervisors shall authorize a designee to approve the Sexual Assault Response Teams (SART), Sexual Assault Forensic Examiner (SAFE) teams, or other qualified medical evidentiary examiners to receive reimbursement through the Office of Emergency Services (Cal OES) for the performance of medical evidentiary examinations for victims of domestic violence and shall notify Cal OES of this designation. The costs associated with these medical evidentiary exams shall be funded by
 the state, subject to appropriation by the Legislature. Each county’s designated SART, SAFE, or other qualified medical evidentiary examiners shall submit invoices to Cal OES, who shall administer the program. A flat reimbursement rate shall be established. Within one year upon initial appropriation, Cal OES shall establish a 60-day reimbursement process. Cal OES shall assess and determine a fair and reasonable reimbursement rate to be reviewed every five years.

(h) Reimbursement shall not be subject to reduced reimbursement rates based on patient history or other reasons. Victims of domestic violence may receive a medical evidentiary exam outside of the jurisdiction where the crime occurred and that county’s approved SART, SAFE teams, or qualified medical evidentiary examiners shall be reimbursed for the performance of these exams.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 557, Sec. 1.   (AB 2185)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11161.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that on or before January 1, 2006, the California District Attorneys Association, in conjunction with interested parties, including, but not limited to, the Department of Justice, the California Narcotic Officers’ Association, the California Police Chiefs’ Association, the California State Sheriffs’ Association, the California Medical Association, the American Pain Society, the American Academy of Pain Medicine, the California Society of Anesthesiologists, the California Chapter of the American College
 of Emergency Physicians, the California Medical Board, the California Orthopedic Association, and other medical and patient advocacy entities specializing in pain control therapies, shall develop protocols for the development and implementation of interagency investigations in connection with a physician’s prescription of medication to patients. The protocols are intended to assure the competent review of, and that relevant investigation procedures are followed for, the suspected undertreatment, undermedication, overtreatment, and overmedication of pain cases. Consideration shall be made for the special circumstances of urban and rural communities. The investigation protocol shall be designed to facilitate communication between the medical and law enforcement communities and the timely return of medical records pertaining to the identity, diagnosis, prognosis, or treatment of any patient that are seized by law enforcement from a physician who is suspected of engaging in or having engaged in criminal activity
 related to the documents.

(b) The costs incurred by the California District Attorneys Association in implementing this section shall be solicited and funded from nongovernmental entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 864, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11161.8.

Every person, firm, or corporation conducting any hospital in the state, or the managing agent thereof, or the person managing or in charge of such hospital, or in charge of any ward or part of such hospital, who receives a patient transferred from a health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code or from a community care facility, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, who exhibits a physical injury or condition which, in the opinion of the admitting physician, reasonably appears to be the result of neglect or abuse, shall report such fact by telephone and in writing, within 36 hours, to both the local police authority having
 jurisdiction and the county health department.

Any registered nurse, licensed vocational nurse, or licensed clinical social worker employed at such hospital may also make a report under this section, if, in the opinion of such person, a patient exhibits a physical injury or condition which reasonably appears to be the result of neglect or abuse.

Every physician and surgeon who has under his charge or care any such patient who exhibits a physical injury or condition which reasonably appears to be the result of neglect or abuse shall make such report.

The report shall state the character and extent of the physical injury or condition.

No employee shall be discharged, suspended, disciplined, or harassed for making a report pursuant to this section.

No person shall incur any civil or criminal
 liability as a result of making any report authorized by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------

11161.9.

(a) A health practitioner who makes a report in accordance with this article shall not incur civil or criminal liability as a result of any report required or authorized by this article.

(b) (1) No person required or authorized to report pursuant to this article, or designated by a person required or authorized to report pursuant to this article, who takes photographs of a person suspected of being a person described in this article about whom a report is
 required or authorized shall incur any civil or criminal liability for taking the photographs, causing the photographs to be taken, or disseminating the photographs to local law enforcement with the reports required by this article in accordance with this article. However, this subdivision shall not be deemed to grant immunity from civil or criminal liability with respect to any other use of the photographs.

(2) A court may award attorney’s fees to a commercial film and photographic print processor when a suit is brought against the processor because of a disclosure mandated by this article and the court finds that the suit is frivolous.

(c) A health practitioner who, pursuant to a request from an adult protective services agency or a local law enforcement agency, provides the requesting agency with access to the victim of a known or suspected instance of abuse shall not incur
 civil or criminal liability as a result of providing that access.

(d) No employee shall be discharged, suspended, disciplined, or harassed for making a report pursuant to this section.

(e) This section does not apply to mandated reporting of child abuse, as provided for in Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 992, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11162.

A violation of this article is a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 992, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11162.5.

As used in this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Health practitioner” has the same meaning as provided in paragraphs (21) to (28), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 11165.7.

(b) “Clinic” is limited to include any clinic specified in Sections 1204 and 1204.3 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) “Health facility” has the same meaning as provided
 in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) “Reasonably suspects” means that it is objectively reasonable for a person to entertain a suspicion, based upon facts that could cause a reasonable person in a like position, drawing, when appropriate, on his or her training and experience, to suspect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 701, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

11162.7.

This article shall not apply when a report is required to be made pursuant to the Child Abuse and Neglect Reporting Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164)), and Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 15600) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 992, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11163.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that even though the Legislature has provided for immunity from liability, pursuant to Section 11161.9, for persons required or authorized to report pursuant to this article, that immunity does not eliminate the possibility that actions may be brought against those persons based upon required reports of abuse pursuant to other laws.

In order to further limit the financial hardship that those persons may incur as a result of fulfilling their legal responsibility, it is necessary that they not be unfairly burdened by legal fees incurred in defending those actions.

(b) (1) Therefore,
 a health practitioner may present a claim to the Department of General Services for reasonable attorney’s fees incurred in any action against that person on the basis of that person reporting in accordance with this article if the court dismisses the action upon a demurrer or motion for summary judgment made by that person or if that person prevails in the action.

(2) The Department of General Services shall allow the claim pursuant to paragraph (1) if the requirements of paragraph (1) are met, and the claim shall be paid from an appropriation to be made for that purpose. Attorney’s fees awarded pursuant to this section shall not exceed an hourly rate greater than the rate charged by the Attorney General at the time the award is made and shall not exceed an aggregate amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(3) This subdivision shall not apply if a public entity has provided
 for the defense of the action pursuant to Section 995 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 256.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

11163.2.

(a) In any court proceeding or administrative hearing, neither the physician-patient privilege nor the psychotherapist privilege applies to the information required to be reported pursuant to this article.

(b) The reports required by this article shall be kept confidential by the health facility, clinic, or physician’s office that submitted the report, and by local law enforcement agencies, and shall only be disclosed by local law enforcement agencies to those involved in the
 investigation of the report or the enforcement of a criminal law implicated by a report. In no case shall the person suspected or accused of inflicting the wound, other injury, or assaultive or abusive conduct upon the injured person or his or her attorney be allowed access to the injured person’s whereabouts.

(c) For the purposes of this article, reports of suspected child abuse and information contained therein may be disclosed only to persons or agencies with whom investigations of child abuse are coordinated under the regulations promulgated under Section 11174.

(d) The Board of Prison Terms may subpoena reports that are not unfounded and reports that concern only the current incidents upon which parole revocation proceedings are pending against a parolee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 992, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11163.3.

(a) A county may establish an interagency domestic violence death review team to assist local agencies in identifying and reviewing domestic violence deaths and near deaths, including homicides and suicides, and facilitating communication among the various agencies involved in domestic violence cases. Interagency domestic violence death review teams have been used successfully to ensure that incidents of domestic violence and abuse are recognized and that agency involvement is reviewed to develop recommendations for policies and protocols for community prevention and intervention initiatives to reduce and eradicate the incidence of domestic violence.

(b) (1) For
 purposes of this section, “abuse” has the meaning set forth in Section 6203 of the Family Code and “domestic violence” has the meaning set forth in Section 6211 of the Family Code.

(2) For purposes of this section, “near death” means the victim suffered a life-threatening injury, as determined by a licensed physician or licensed nurse, as a result of domestic violence.

(c) A county may develop a protocol that may be used as a guideline to assist coroners and other persons who perform autopsies on domestic violence victims in the identification of domestic violence, in the determination of whether domestic violence contributed to death or whether domestic violence had occurred prior to death, but was not the actual cause of death, and in the proper written
 reporting procedures for domestic violence, including the designation of the cause and mode of death.

(d) County domestic violence death review teams shall be comprised of, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Experts in the field of forensic pathology.

(2) Medical personnel with expertise in domestic violence abuse.

(3) Coroners and medical examiners.

(4) Criminologists.

(5) District attorneys and city attorneys.

(6) Representatives of domestic violence victim service organizations,
 as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code.

(7) Law enforcement personnel.

(8) Representatives of local agencies that are involved with domestic violence abuse reporting.

(9) County health department staff who deal with domestic violence victims’ health issues.

(10) Representatives of local child abuse agencies.

(11) Local professional associations of persons described in paragraphs (1) to (10), inclusive.

(e) An oral or written communication or a document shared within or produced by a domestic violence death review
 team related to a domestic violence death review is confidential and not subject to disclosure or discoverable by a third party. An oral or written communication or a document provided by a third party to a domestic violence death review team, or between a third party and a domestic violence death review team, is confidential and not subject to disclosure or discoverable by a third party. This includes a statement provided by a survivor in a near-death case review. Notwithstanding the foregoing, recommendations of a domestic violence death review team upon the completion of a review may be disclosed at the discretion of a majority of the members of the domestic violence death review team.

(f) Each organization represented on a domestic violence death review team may share with other members of the team information in its possession
 concerning the victim who is the subject of the review or any person who was in contact with the victim and any other information deemed by the organization to be pertinent to the review. Any information shared by an organization with other members of a team is confidential. This provision shall permit the disclosure to members of the team of any information deemed confidential, privileged, or prohibited from disclosure by any other statute.

(g) Written and oral information may be disclosed to a domestic violence death review team established pursuant to this section. The team may make a request in writing for the information sought and any person with information of the kind described in paragraph (2) may rely on the request in determining whether information may be disclosed to the team.

(1) An individual or agency that has information governed by this subdivision shall not be required to disclose information. The intent of this subdivision is to allow the voluntary disclosure of information by the individual or agency that has the information.

(2) The following information may be disclosed pursuant to this subdivision:

(A) Notwithstanding Section 56.10 of the Civil Code, medical information.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 5328 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, mental health information.

(C) Notwithstanding Section 15633.5 of the Welfare and
 Institutions Code, information from elder abuse reports and investigations, except the identity of persons who have made reports, which shall not be disclosed.

(D) Notwithstanding Section 11167.5 of the Penal Code, information from child abuse reports and investigations, except the identity of persons who have made reports, which shall not be disclosed.

(E) State summary criminal history information, criminal offender record information, and local summary criminal history information, as defined in Sections 11075, 11105, and 13300 of the Penal Code.

(F) Notwithstanding Section 11163.2 of the Penal Code, information pertaining to reports by health practitioners of persons suffering from physical
 injuries inflicted by means of a firearm or of persons suffering physical injury where the injury is a result of assaultive or abusive conduct, and information relating to whether a physician referred the person to local domestic violence services as recommended by Section 11161 of the Penal Code.

(G) Notwithstanding Section 827 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, information in any juvenile court proceeding.

(H) Information maintained by the Family Court, including information relating to the Family Conciliation Court Law pursuant to Section 1818 of the Family Code, and Mediation of Custody and Visitation Issues pursuant to Section 3177 of the Family Code.

(I) Information provided to probation officers in the course of the
 performance of their duties, including, but not limited to, the duty to prepare reports pursuant to Section 1203.10 of the Penal Code, as well as the information on which these reports are based.

(J) Notwithstanding Section 10850 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, records of in-home supportive services, unless disclosure is prohibited by federal law.

(3) The disclosure of written and oral information authorized under this subdivision shall apply notwithstanding Sections 2263, 2918, 4982, and 6068 of the Business and Professions Code, or the lawyer-client privilege protected by Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, the physician-patient privilege protected by Article 6 (commencing with Section 990) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence
 Code, the psychotherapist-patient privilege protected by Article 7 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, the sexual assault counselor-victim privilege protected by Article 8.5 (commencing with Section 1035) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, the domestic violence counselor-victim privilege protected by Article 8.7 (commencing with Section 1037) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, and the human trafficking caseworker-victim privilege protected by Article 8.8 (commencing with Section 1038) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code.

(4) In near-death cases, representatives of domestic violence victim service organizations, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code, shall obtain an individual’s informed consent in accordance with all
 applicable state and federal confidentiality laws, before disclosing confidential information about that individual to another team member as specified in this section. In death review cases, representatives of domestic violence victim service organizations shall only provide client-specific information in accordance with both state and federal confidentiality requirements.

(5) Near-death case reviews shall only occur after any prosecution has concluded.

(6) Near-death survivors shall not be compelled to participate in death review team investigations; their participation is voluntary. In cases of death, the victim’s family members may be invited to participate, however they shall not be compelled to do so; their participation is voluntary. Members of the death review
 teams shall be prepared to provide referrals for services to address the unmet needs of survivors and their families when appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 986, Sec. 1.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11163.4.

Subject to available funding, the Attorney General, working with the state domestic violence coalition, shall develop, no later than January 1, 2025, a protocol for the development and implementation of interagency domestic violence death review teams for use by counties, which shall include relevant procedures for both urban and rural counties. The protocol shall be designed to facilitate communication among persons who perform autopsies and the various persons and agencies involved in domestic violence cases so that incidents of domestic violence, near
 deaths related to domestic violence, and deaths related to domestic violence are recognized and surviving nonoffending family and household members and domestic partners receive the appropriate services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 986, Sec. 2.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11163.5.

(a) The purpose of this section is to coordinate and integrate state and local efforts to address fatal domestic violence, and to create a body of information to prevent domestic violence deaths.

(b) (1) The Department of Justice is hereby authorized to carry out the purpose of this section with the cooperation of the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Public Health, the California State Coroner’s Association, the County Welfare Directors Association, and the state domestic violence coalition.

(2) The Department of Justice, after consulting with the agencies and organizations specified in paragraph (1), may consult with other representatives of other
 agencies and private organizations to accomplish the purpose of this section.

(c) To accomplish the purpose of this section, the Department of Justice and agencies and organizations involved may engage in the following activities:

(1) Collect, analyze, and interpret state and local data on domestic violence death and near death in an annual report to be available upon request. The report may contain, but need not be limited to, information provided by state agencies and the county domestic violence death review teams for the preceding year.

(2) Develop a state and local database on domestic violence deaths.

(A) The state data may include the Department of Justice statistics, the State Department of Public Health Vital Records, and information obtained
 by other relevant state agencies.

(B) The Department of Justice, in consultation with the agencies and organizations specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), may develop a model minimal local data set and request data from local teams for inclusion in the annual report.

(3) Distribute a copy of the report to public officials in the state who deal with domestic violence issues and to those agencies responsible for domestic violence death review investigation in each county.

(d) The Department of Justice may direct the creation of a statewide domestic violence death review team directory, which shall contain the names of the members of the agencies and private organizations participating under this section, the members of local domestic violence death review teams, and the local liaisons to those teams. The
 department may maintain and update the directory annually.

(e) The agencies or private organizations participating under this section shall participate without reimbursement from the state. Costs incurred by participants for travel or per diem shall be borne by the participant agency or organization. Any reports prepared by the Department of Justice pursuant to this section shall be in consultation with the state domestic violence coalition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 163.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11163.6.

In order to ensure consistent and uniform results, data may be collected and summarized by the domestic violence death review teams to show the statistical occurrence of domestic violence deaths or near deaths in the team’s county that occur under the following circumstances:

(a) The deceased was a victim of a homicide committed by a current or former spouse, fiance, or dating partner.

(b) The deceased was the victim of a suicide, was the current or former spouse, fiance, or dating partner of the perpetrator and was also the victim of previous acts of domestic violence.

(c) The
 deceased was the perpetrator of the homicide of a former or current spouse, fiance, or dating partner and the perpetrator was also the victim of a suicide.

(d) The deceased was the perpetrator of the homicide of a former or current spouse, fiance, or dating partner and the perpetrator was also the victim of a homicide related to the domestic homicide incident.

(e) The deceased was a child of either the homicide victim or the perpetrator, or both.

(f) The deceased was a current or former spouse, fiance, or dating partner of the current or former spouse, fiance, or dating partner of the perpetrator.

(g) The deceased was a law enforcement officer, emergency medical
 personnel, or other agency responding to a domestic violence incident.

(h) The deceased was a family member, other than identified above, of the perpetrator.

(i) The deceased was the perpetrator of the homicide of a family member, other than identified above.

(j) The deceased had a disability and the homicide was related to domestic violence.

(k) The deceased was a person not included in the above categories and the homicide was related to domestic violence.

(l) The victim suffered a substantial risk of serious bodily injury or death from domestic violence.

(m) The circumstances of the domestic violence event indicate the perpetrator more likely than not intended to kill or seriously injure the victim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 986, Sec. 4.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.4. Homeless Death Review Committees [11163.70. - 11163.74.]

11163.70.

For purposes of this article, unless the context requires otherwise, “homeless” has the same meaning as in subdivision (d) of Section 16523 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   (AB 271)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11163.71.

(a) A county may establish a homeless death review committee to assist local agencies in identifying the root causes of death of homeless individuals and facilitating communication among persons who perform autopsies and the various persons and agencies involved in supporting the homeless population.

(b) A county that establishes a homeless death review committee pursuant to subdivision (a) may develop a protocol to be used as guidelines by persons performing autopsies on homeless individuals to assist coroners and other persons who perform autopsies in the identification of the cause and mode of death of the individual.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   (AB 271)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11163.72.

(a) An oral or written communication or a document shared within or produced by a homeless death review committee related to a homeless death review is confidential and not subject to disclosure or discoverable by another third party.
